District of Columbia statutes.
29-805.04

Power of personal representative of deceased member.

If a member dies, the deceased member’s personal representative or other legal representative may exercise the rights of a transferee provided in § 29-805.02(c) and, for the purposes of settling the estate, the rights of a current member under § 29-804.10.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-805.02 and § 29-806.03.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 504 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).